src/dictionaries/hyw.aff
FLAG long
#nel qel
SFX	VD	Y	324
SFX	VD	նել	այ/CH	.
SFX	VD	նել	ար/CH	.
SFX	VD	նել	աւ/CH .
SFX	VD	նել	անք/CH .
SFX	VD	նել	աք/CH .
SFX	VD	նել	ան/CH .
SFX	VD	նիլ	այ/CH	.
SFX	VD	նիլ	ար/CH	.
SFX	VD	նիլ	աւ/CH .
SFX	VD	նիլ	անք/CH .
SFX	VD	նիլ	աք/CH .
SFX	VD	նիլ	ան/CH .
SFX	VD	չիլ	այ/CH	.
SFX	VD	չիլ	ար/CH	.
SFX	VD	չիլ	աւ/CH .
SFX	VD	չիլ	անք/CH .
SFX	VD	չիլ	աք/CH .
SFX	VD	չիլ	ան/CH .
SFX	VD	իլ	այ/CH	.
SFX	VD	իլ	ար/CH	.
SFX	VD	իլ	աւ/CH .
SFX	VD	իլ	անք/CH .
SFX	VD	իլ	աք/CH .
SFX	VD	իլ	ան/CH .
SFX	VD	նել	ած/CHABGEINDE .
SFX	VD	նել	ածներ/CHABG2INDE .
SFX	VD	նիլ	ած/CHABGEINDE .
SFX	VD	նիլ	ածներ/CHABG2INDE .
SFX	VD	չիլ	ած/CHABGEINDE .
SFX	VD	չիլ	ածներ/CHABG2INDE .
SFX	VD	իլ	ած/CHABGEINDE .
SFX	VD	իլ	ածներ/CHABG2INDE .
SFX	VD	իլ	ող/CHABGEINDE .
SFX	VD	իլ	ողներ/CHABG2INDE .
SFX	VD	նել	ցուող/CHABGEINDE .	
SFX	VD	նել	ցուողներ/CHABG2INDE .
SFX	VD	նիլ	ցուող/CHABGEINDE .	
SFX	VD	նիլ	ցուողներ/CHABG2INDE .
SFX	VD	չիլ	ցուող/CHABGEINDE .	
SFX	VD	չիլ	ցուողներ/CHABG2INDE .
SFX	VD	իլ	ցուող/CHABGEINDE .	
SFX	VD	իլ	ցուողներ/CHABG2INDE .
SFX	VD	նել	ցուած/CHABGEINDE .
SFX	VD	նել	ցուածներ/CHABG2INDE .
SFX	VD	նիլ	ցուած/CHABGEINDE .
SFX	VD	նիլ	ցուածներ/CHABG2INDE .
SFX	VD	չիլ	ցուած/CHABGEINDE .
SFX	VD	չիլ	ցուածներ/CHABG2INDE .
SFX	VD	իլ	ցուած/CHABGEINDE .
SFX	VD	իլ	ցուածներ/CHABG2INDE .
SFX	VD	նել	ցուցած/CHABGEINDE .
SFX	VD	նել	ցուցածներ/CHABG2INDE .
SFX	VD	նիլ	ցուցած/CHABGEINDE .
SFX	VD	նիլ	ցուցածներ/CHABG2INDE .
SFX	VD	չիլ	ցուցած/CHABGEINDE .
SFX	VD	չիլ	ցուցածներ/CHABG2INDE .
SFX	VD	իլ	ցուցած/CHABGEINDE .
SFX	VD	իլ	ցուցածներ/CHABG2INDE .
SFX	VD	նել	եր .	
SFX	VD	նիլ	եր .
SFX	VD	իլ	եր.
SFX	VD	չիլ	եր.
SFX	VD	նել	ցուիլ/CHDE .	
SFX	VD	նել	ցուել/CHG2ABINDE .
SFX	VD	նիլ	ցուիլ/CHDE .	
SFX	VD	նիլ	ցուել/CHG2ABINDE .
SFX	VD	իլ	ցուիլ/CHDE .
SFX	VD	իլ	ցուել/CHG2ABINDE .
SFX	VD	չիլ	ցուիլ/CHDE .
SFX	VD	չիլ	ցուել/CHG2ABINDE .
SFX	VD	նել	ցուցեր .	
SFX	VD	նիլ	ցուցեր .
SFX	VD	իլ	ցուցեր .
SFX	VD	չիլ	ցուցեր .
SFX	VD	նել	իր .	
SFX	VD	նիլ	իր .
SFX	VD	չիլ	իր .
SFX	VD	իլ	իր .
SFX	VD	նել	էք .	
SFX	VD	նիլ	էք .
SFX	VD	չիլ	էք .
SFX	VD	իլ	էք .
SFX	VD	ել	ուիլ/CHDE	.
SFX	VD	ել	ուել/CHG2ABINDE	.
SFX	VD	իլ	ուիլ/CHDE	.
SFX	VD	իլ	ուել/CHG2ABINDE	.
SFX	VD	ել	ուիմ/CHGU	.
SFX	VD	ել	ուիս/CHGU	.
SFX	VD	ել	ուի/CHGU	.
SFX	VD	ել	ուինք/CHGU	.
SFX	VD	ել	ուիք/CHGU	.
SFX	VD	ել	ուին/CHGU	.
SFX	VD	իլ	ուիմ/CHGU	.
SFX	VD	իլ	ուիս/CHGU	.
SFX	VD	իլ	ուի/CHGU	.
SFX	VD	իլ	ուինք/CHGU	.
SFX	VD	իլ	ուիք/CHGU	.
SFX	VD	իլ	ուին/CHGU	.
SFX	VD	ել	ուէի/CHGU	.
SFX	VD	ել	ուէիր/CHGU	.
SFX	VD	ել	ուէր/CHGU	.
SFX	VD	ել	ուէինք/CHGU	.
SFX	VD	ել	ուէիք/CHGU	.
SFX	VD	ել	ուէին/CHGU	.
SFX	VD	իլ	ուէի/CHGU	.
SFX	VD	իլ	ուէիր/CHGU	.
SFX	VD	իլ	ուէր/CHGU	.
SFX	VD	իլ	ուէինք/CHGU	.
SFX	VD	իլ	ուէիք/CHGU	.
SFX	VD	իլ	ուէին/CHGU	.
SFX	VD	նել	ցնող/CHDEABGEIN .
SFX	VD	նել	ցնողներ/CHDEABG2IN .
SFX	VD	նել	ցուցած/CHDEPPABGEIN .
SFX	VD	նել	ցուցածներ/CHDEABG2IN .	
SFX	VD	նիլ	ցնող/CHDEABGEIN .
SFX	VD	նիլ	ցնողներ/CHDEABG2IN .
SFX	VD	նիլ	ցուցած/CHDEABGEIN .
SFX	VD	նիլ	ցուցածներ/CHDEABG2IN .
SFX	VD	նել	ցուիլ/CHDE .	
SFX	VD	նել	ցուել/CHG2ABINDE .
SFX	VD	նել	ցուէ .	
SFX	VD	նել	ցուեցէք .
SFX	VD	նիլ	ցուէ .	
SFX	VD	նիլ	ցուեցէք .
SFX	VD	նել	ցուցէք .
SFX	VD	նել	ցուր .
SFX	VD	նել	ցուցէք .
SFX	VD	նիլ	ցուր .
SFX	VD	նիլ	ցրեցէք .
SFX	VD	նել	ցնել/CHG2ABINDE	.
SFX	VD	նել	ցներ	.
SFX	VD	նիլ	ցներ	.
SFX	VD	նել	ցնեմ/CHGU	.
SFX	VD	նել	ցնես/CHGU	.
SFX	VD	նել	ցնէ/CHGU	.
SFX	VD	նել	ցնենք/CHGU	.
SFX	VD	նել	ցնէք/CHGU	.
SFX	VD	նել	ցնեն/CHGU	.
SFX	VD	նել	ցնէի/CHGU	.
SFX	VD	նել	ցնէիր/CHGU	.
SFX	VD	նել	ցնէր/CHGU	.
SFX	VD	նել	ցնէինք/CHGU	.
SFX	VD	նել	ցնէիք/CHGU	.
SFX	VD	նել	ցնէին/CHGU	.
SFX	VD	նիլ	ցնեմ/CHGU	.
SFX	VD	նիլ	ցնես/CHGU	.
SFX	VD	նիլ	ցնէ/CHGU	.
SFX	VD	նիլ	ցնենք/CHGU	.
SFX	VD	նիլ	ցնէք/CHGU	.
SFX	VD	նիլ	ցնեն/CHGU	.
SFX	VD	նիլ	ցնէի/CHGU	.
SFX	VD	նիլ	ցնէիր/CHGU	.
SFX	VD	նիլ	ցնէր/CHGU	.
SFX	VD	նիլ	ցնէինք/CHGU	.
SFX	VD	նիլ	ցնէիք/CHGU	.
SFX	VD	նիլ	ցնէին/CHGU	.
SFX	VD	նել	ցուցի/CH	.
SFX	VD	նել	ցուցիր/CH	.
SFX	VD	նել	ցուց/CH	.
SFX	VD	նել	ցուցինք/CH	.
SFX	VD	նել	ցուցիք/CH	.
SFX	VD	նել	ցուցին/CH	.
SFX	VD	նիլ	ցուցի/CH	.
SFX	VD	նիլ	ցուցիր/CH	.
SFX	VD	նիլ	ցուց/CH	.
SFX	VD	նիլ	ցուցինք/CH	.
SFX	VD	նիլ	ցուցիք/CH	.
SFX	VD	նիլ	ցուցին/CH	.
SFX	VD	նել	ցնելիք/CHDEGEABINPP .
SFX	VD	նել	ցուելիք/CHDEGEABINPP	.
SFX	VD	նել	ցնելի/CHDEGEABINPP .
SFX	VD	նել	ցուելի/CHDEGEABINPP	.
SFX	VD	նիլ	ցնելիք/CHDEGEABINPP .
SFX	VD	նիլ	ցուելիք/CHDEGEABINPP	.
SFX	VD	նիլ	ցնելի/CHDEGEABINPP .
SFX	VD	նիլ	ցուելի/CHDEGEABINPP	.
SFX	VD	նել	ցուեր .
SFX	VD	նել	ցուիլ/CHDE	.
SFX	VD	նել	ցուեր .
SFX	VD	նիլ	ցուեր .
SFX	VD	նել	ցուիլ/CHDE	.
SFX	VD	նել	ցուիլ/CHG2ABINDE	.
SFX	VD	նիլ	ցուիլ/CHDE	.
SFX	VD	նիլ	ցուիլ/CHG2ABINDE	.
SFX	VD	նել	ցուիմ/CHGU	.
SFX	VD	նել	ցուիս/CHGU	.
SFX	VD	նել	ցուի/CHGU	.
SFX	VD	նել	ցուինք/CHGU	.
SFX	VD	նել	ցուիք/CHGU	.
SFX	VD	նել	ցուին/CHGU	.
SFX	VD	նել	ցուէի/CHGU	.
SFX	VD	նել	ցուէիր/CHGU	.
SFX	VD	նել	ցուէր/CHGU	.
SFX	VD	նել	ցուէինք/CHGU	.
SFX	VD	նել	ցուէիք/CHGU	.
SFX	VD	նել	ցուէին/CHGU	.
SFX	VD	նիլ	ցուիմ/CHGU	.
SFX	VD	նիլ	ցուիս/CHGU	.
SFX	VD	նիլ	ցուի/CHGU	.
SFX	VD	նիլ	ցուինք/CHGU	.
SFX	VD	նիլ	ցուիք/CHGU	.
SFX	VD	նիլ	ցուին/CHGU	.
SFX	VD	նիլ	ցուէի/CHGU	.
SFX	VD	նիլ	ցուէիր/CHGU	.
SFX	VD	նիլ	ցուէր/CHGU	.
SFX	VD	նիլ	ցուէինք/CHGU	.
SFX	VD	նիլ	ցուէիք/CHGU	.
SFX	VD	նիլ	ցուէին/CHGU	.
SFX	VD	նել	ցուեցայ/CH	.
SFX	VD	նել	ցուեցար/CH	.
SFX	VD	նել	ցուեցաւ/CH .
SFX	VD	նել	ցուեցանք/CH .
SFX	VD	նել	ցուեցաք/CH .
SFX	VD	նել	ցուեցան/CH .
SFX	VD	չիլ	ցնող/CHDEABGEIN .
SFX	VD	չիլ	ցնողներ/CHDEABG2IN .
SFX	VD	չիլ	ցրած/CHDEABGEIN .
SFX	VD	չիլ	ցրածներ/CHDEABG2IN .	
SFX	VD	չիլ	ցուիլ/CHG2ABINDE .	
SFX	VD	չիլ	ցուէ .	
SFX	VD	չիլ	ցուեցէք .
SFX	VD	չիլ	ցուցէք .
SFX	VD	չիլ	ցուր .
SFX	VD	չիլ	ցրեցէք .
SFX	VD	չիլ	ցնել/CHG2ABINDE	.
SFX	VD	չիլ	ցներ	.
SFX	VD	չիլ	ցնեմ/CHGU	.
SFX	VD	չիլ	ցնես/CHGU	.
SFX	VD	չիլ	ցնէ/CHGU	.
SFX	VD	չիլ	ցնենք/CHGU	.
SFX	VD	չիլ	ցնէք/CHGU	.
SFX	VD	չիլ	ցնեն/CHGU	.
SFX	VD	չիլ	ցնէի/CHGU	.
SFX	VD	չիլ	ցնէիր/CHGU	.
SFX	VD	չիլ	ցնէր/CHGU	.
SFX	VD	չիլ	ցնէինք/CHGU	.
SFX	VD	չիլ	ցնէիք/CHGU	.
SFX	VD	չիլ	ցնէին/CHGU	.
SFX	VD	չիլ	ցուցի/CH	.
SFX	VD	չիլ	ցուցիր/CHGU	.
SFX	VD	չիլ	ցուց/CHGU	.
SFX	VD	չիլ	ցուցինք/CHGU	.
SFX	VD	չիլ	ցուցիք/CHGU	.
SFX	VD	չիլ	ցուցին/CHGU	.
SFX	VD	չիլ	ցնելիք/CHDEGEABINPP	.
SFX	VD	չիլ	ցուելիք/CHDEGEABINPP	.
SFX	VD	չիլ	ցնելի/CHDEGEABINPP	.
SFX	VD	չիլ	ցուելի/CHDEGEABINPP	.
SFX	VD	չիլ	ցուեր .
SFX	VD	չիլ	ցուիլ/CHDE	.
SFX	VD	չիլ	ցուել/CHG2ABINDE	.
SFX	VD	չիլ	ցուիմ/CHGU	.
SFX	VD	չիլ	ցուիս/CHGU	.
SFX	VD	չիլ	ցուի/CHGU	.
SFX	VD	չիլ	ցուինք/CHGU	.
SFX	VD	չիլ	ցուիք/CHGU	.
SFX	VD	չիլ	ցուին/CHGU	.
SFX	VD	չիլ	ցուէի/CHGU	.
SFX	VD	չիլ	ցուէիր/CHGU	.
SFX	VD	չիլ	ցուէր/CHGU	.
SFX	VD	չիլ	ցուէինք/CHGU	.
SFX	VD	չիլ	ցուէիք/CHGU	.
SFX	VD	չիլ	ցուէին/CHGU	.
SFX	VD	չիլ	ցուեցայ/CH	.
SFX	VD	չիլ	ցուեցար/CH	.
SFX	VD	չիլ	ցուեցաւ/CH .
SFX	VD	չիլ	ցուեցանք/CH .
SFX	VD	չիլ	ցուեցաք/CH .
SFX	VD	չիլ	ցուեցան/CH .
SFX	VD	իլ	ցնող/CHDEABGEIN .
SFX	VD	իլ	ցնողներ/CHDEABG2IN .
SFX	VD	իլ	ցրած/CHDEABGEIN .
SFX	VD	իլ	ցրածներ/CHDEABG2IN .	
SFX	VD	իլ	ցուիլ/CHG2ABINDE .	
SFX	VD	իլ	ցուէ .	
SFX	VD	իլ	ցուեցէք .
SFX	VD	իլ	ցուցէք .
SFX	VD	իլ	ցուր .
SFX	VD	իլ	ցրեցէք .
SFX	VD	իլ	ցնել/CHG2ABINDE	.
SFX	VD	իլ	ցներ	.
SFX	VD	իլ	ցնեմ/CHGU	.
SFX	VD	իլ	ցնես/CHGU	.
SFX	VD	իլ	ցնէ/CHGU	.
SFX	VD	իլ	ցնենք/CHGU	.
SFX	VD	իլ	ցնէք/CHGU	.
SFX	VD	իլ	ցնեն/CHGU	.
SFX	VD	իլ	ցնէի/CHGU	.
SFX	VD	իլ	ցնէիր/CHGU	.
SFX	VD	իլ	ցնէր/CHGU	.
SFX	VD	իլ	ցնէինք/CHGU	.
SFX	VD	իլ	ցնէիք/CHGU	.
SFX	VD	իլ	ցնէին/CHGU	.
SFX	VD	իլ	ցուցի/CH	.
SFX	VD	իլ	ցուցիր/CHGU	.
SFX	VD	իլ	ցուց/CHGU	.
SFX	VD	իլ	ցուցինք/CHGU	.
SFX	VD	իլ	ցուցիք/CHGU	.
SFX	VD	իլ	ցուցին/CHGU	.
SFX	VD	իլ	ցնելիք/CHDEGEABINPP	.
SFX	VD	իլ	ցուելիք/CHDEGEABINPP	.
SFX	VD	իլ	ցնելի/CHDEGEABINPP	.
SFX	VD	իլ	ցուելի/CHDEGEABINPP	.
SFX	VD	իլ	ցուեր .
SFX	VD	իլ	ցուիլ/CHDE	.
SFX	VD	իլ	ցուել/CHG2ABINDE	.
SFX	VD	իլ	ցուիմ/CHGU	.
SFX	VD	իլ	ցուիս/CHGU	.
SFX	VD	իլ	ցուի/CHGU	.
SFX	VD	իլ	ցուինք/CHGU	.
SFX	VD	իլ	ցուիք/CHGU	.
SFX	VD	իլ	ցուին/CHGU	.
SFX	VD	իլ	ցուէի/CHGU	.
SFX	VD	իլ	ցուէիր/CHGU	.
SFX	VD	իլ	ցուէր/CHGU	.
SFX	VD	իլ	ցուէինք/CHGU	.
SFX	VD	իլ	ցուէիք/CHGU	.
SFX	VD	իլ	ցուէին/CHGU	.
SFX	VD	իլ	ցուեցայ/CH	.
SFX	VD	իլ	ցուեցար/CH	.
SFX	VD	իլ	ցուեցաւ/CH .
SFX	VD	իլ	ցուեցանք/CH .
SFX	VD	իլ	ցուեցաք/CH .
SFX	VD	իլ	ցուեցան/CH .
