src/dictionaries/hyw.dic
անցնիլ/VAVTVDDEABG2IN
առնել/VAVTVDDEABG2IN
գտնել/VAVUVDDEABG2IN
դպչիլ/VAVUVDDEABG2IN
ելնել/VAVTVDDEABG2IN
եկչել/CHVD00
թռնել/VAVUVDDEABG2IN
թռնիլ/VAVUVDDEABG2IN
թռչել/VAVUVDDEABG2IN
թռչիլ/VAVUVDDEABG2IN
խօսեցուիլ/VAVUVDDEABG2IN
խօսիլ/VAVUVDDEABG2IN
խօսուիլ/VAVUVDDEABG2IN
ծնիլ/VAVUVDDEABG2IN
կարդացուիլ/VAVUVDDEABG2IN
կերչել/CHVD00
կպնել/VAVUVDDEABG2IN
կպչել/VAVUVDDEABG2IN
հագնիլ/VAVUVDDEABG2IN
հակիլ/VAVUVDDEABG2IN
հայրենադարձնել/VAVUVDDEABG2IN
հասնիլ/VAVUVDDEABG2IN
հասցուիլ/VAVUVDDEABG2IN
հարցուիլ/VAVUVDDEABG2IN
հեծնել/VAVUVBVDDEABG2IN
հպիլ/VAVUVDDEABG2IN
հրաժարիլ/VAVUVDDEABG2IN
մեռնիլ/VAVUVDDEABG2IN
մոռցուիլ/VAVUVDDEABG2IN
մտնել/VAVUVDDEABG2IN
նստիլ/VAVUVDDEABG2IN
պրծիլ/VAVUVDDEABG2IN
պրծնել/VAVUVDDEABG2IN
սիրեցուիլ/VAVUVDDEABG2IN
սիրուիլ/VAVUVDDEABG2IN
սկսիլ/VAVUVDDEABG2IN
վերագտնել/VAVUVDDEABG2IN
տեսնել/VAVUVDDEABG2IN
փախնել/VAVUVDDEABG2IN
փախնիլ/VAVUVDDEABG2IN
փախչիլ/VAVUVDDEABG2IN
փակել/VAVUVDDEABG2IN
փակիլ/VAVUVDDEABG2IN
փակչիլ/VAVUVDDEABG2IN
փլիլ/VAVUVDDEABG2IN
փրթիլ/VAVUVDDEABG2IN
